Illinois, session 104th, SB1706.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 2.01 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/2.01)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42.01)7    Sec. 2.01. All meetings required by this Act to be public 8shall be held at specified times and places which are 9convenient and open to the public. No meeting required by this 10Act to be public shall be held on a legal holiday unless the 11regular meeting day falls on that holiday.12    Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a quorum of 13members of a public body must be physically present at the 14location of an open meeting. If, however, an open meeting of a 15public body (i) with statewide jurisdiction, (ii) that is an 16Illinois library system with jurisdiction over a specific 17geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, (iii) that is 18a municipal transit district with jurisdiction over a specific 19geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or (iv) that 20is a local workforce investment area with jurisdiction over a 21specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles is 22held simultaneously at one of its offices and one or more other 23locations in a public building, which may include other of its   SB1706- 2 -LRB104 08985 BDA 19041 b1offices, through an interactive video conference and the 2public body provides public notice and public access as 3required under this Act for all locations, then members 4physically present in those locations all count towards 5determining a quorum. "Public building", as used in this 6Section, means any building or portion thereof owned or leased 7by any public body. The requirement that a quorum be 8physically present at the location of an open meeting shall 9not apply, however, to State advisory boards or bodies, 10including committees of the Police Officers' Pension 11Investment Fund, that do not have authority to make binding 12recommendations or determinations or to take any other 13substantive action. 14    Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a quorum of 15members of a public body that is not (i) a public body with 16statewide jurisdiction, (ii) an Illinois library system with 17jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 184,500 square miles, (iii) a municipal transit district with 19jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 204,500 square miles, or (iv) a local workforce innovation area 21with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 224,500 square miles must be physically present at the location 23of a closed meeting. Other members who are not physically 24present at a closed meeting of such a public body may 25participate in the meeting by means of a video or audio 26conference. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce   SB1706- 3 -LRB104 08985 BDA 19041 b1innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 2areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 3Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 4legislation. 5(Source: P.A. 100-477, eff. 9-8-17; 101-640, eff. 6-12-20.)